Louisiana, session 2026, HB204.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4570.3(D)(4) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4570.3. Powers and duties
* * *
D.
* * *
(4)(a) The commission shall timely submit all reports required by the
legislative auditor.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-381 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 204
(b) The commission shall submit bank statements to the legislative auditor
on a monthly basis. The deadline to submit bank statements shall be on the last day
of each month.
Section 2. R.S. 48:1461(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1461. Tax and regulatory exemptions; audits; laws relating to public bodies
* * *
B.(1) Except as provided in this Chapter and by laws generally applicable
to political subdivisions, the system shall not be subject in any respect to the
authority, control, or supervision of any regulatory body of the state, including but
not limited to the Public Service Commission or by any political subdivision of the
state. The system shall not be deemed a common carrier by any court of this state
in a suit for personal injury or property damage. It shall cause its financial records
to be audited annually, shall be subject to inspection and audit by the legislative
auditor, and shall be subject to state laws relating to open meetings, public records,
and public contracts.
(2) The system shall submit bank statements to the legislative auditor on a
monthly basis. The deadline to submit bank statements shall be on the last day of
each month.
Section 3. R.S. 46:1608.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1608.2. East Baton Rouge Council on Aging; duties
The East Baton Rouge Council on Aging shall submit bank statements to the
legislative auditor on a monthly basis. The deadline to submit bank statements shall
be on the last day of each month.